Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.328

[Art. 35] Service of charges.

The trial counsel to whom court-martial charges are referred for trial shall cause to be served upon the accused a copy of the charges upon which trial is to be had. In time of peace no person may, against his or her objection, be brought to trial or be required to participate by himself or herself or counsel in a session called by a military judge under RCW 38.38.380(1), in a general court-martial within a period of five days after the service of the charges upon him or her, or before a special court-martial within a period of three days after the service of the charges upon him or her.

[ 2011 c 336 s 769; 1989 c 48 s 34; 1963 c 220 s 37.]